dev/ortho/cyr-ara.lexc
LEXICON Root 

Alpha ; 

Punct ; 
Digits ;

LEXICON AlphaLoop 

Alpha ;
# ;

LEXICON Alpha

а:а AlphaLoop ;
ә:ә AlphaLoop ;
б:б AlphaLoop ;
п:п AlphaLoop ;
т:т AlphaLoop ;
җ:җ AlphaLoop ;
ч:ч AlphaLoop ;
х:х AlphaLoop ;
д:д AlphaLoop ;
р:р AlphaLoop ;
з:з AlphaLoop ;
ж:ж AlphaLoop ;
с:с AlphaLoop ;
ш:ш AlphaLoop ;
ғ:ғ AlphaLoop ;
ф:ф AlphaLoop ;
қ:қ AlphaLoop ;
к:к AlphaLoop ;
г:г AlphaLoop ;
ң:ң AlphaLoop ;
л:л AlphaLoop ;
м:м AlphaLoop ;
н:н AlphaLoop ;
һ:һ AlphaLoop ;
о:о AlphaLoop ;
у:у AlphaLoop ;
ө:ө AlphaLoop ;
ү:ү AlphaLoop ;
в:в AlphaLoop ;
е:е AlphaLoop ;
и:и AlphaLoop ;
й:й AlphaLoop ;
я:я AlphaLoop ;
ю:ю AlphaLoop ;

А:а AlphaLoop ;
Ә:ә AlphaLoop ;
Б:б AlphaLoop ;
П:п AlphaLoop ;
Т:т AlphaLoop ;
Җ:җ AlphaLoop ;
Ч:ч AlphaLoop ;
Х:х AlphaLoop ;
Д:д AlphaLoop ;
Р:р AlphaLoop ;
З:з AlphaLoop ;
Ж:ж AlphaLoop ;
С:с AlphaLoop ;
Ш:ш AlphaLoop ;
Ғ:ғ AlphaLoop ;
Ф:ф AlphaLoop ;
Қ:қ AlphaLoop ;
К:к AlphaLoop ;
Г:г AlphaLoop ;
Ң:ң AlphaLoop ;
Л:л AlphaLoop ;
М:м AlphaLoop ;
Н:н AlphaLoop ;
Һ:һ AlphaLoop ;
О:о AlphaLoop ;
У:у AlphaLoop ;
Ө:ө AlphaLoop ;
Ү:ү AlphaLoop ;
В:в AlphaLoop ;
Е:е AlphaLoop ;
И:и AlphaLoop ;
Й:й AlphaLoop ;
Я:я AlphaLoop ;
Ю:ю AlphaLoop ;

# ;

LEXICON Digits

<[%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9]+> # ;

LEXICON Punct

%.:%. # ; 
%-:%- # ; 
%,:%, # ; 
!%,:%، # ;  ! Arabic comma
!،:، # ;
!,:، # ;
%;:%; # ; 
%::%: # ; 
%!:%! # ; 
%?:%? # ; 
%“:%“ # ; 
%”:%” # ; 
%«:%« # ; 
%»:%» # ; 
%(:%( # ; 
%):%) # ; 
%–:%– # ; 
